Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB901.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of firefighting equipment when purchased by an individual who is a paid or volunteer 123456789101112131415161718192021 firefighter using personal money and according to the following:(i) At the time of purchase, the individual shall present a department-issued firefighter identification card showing the individual's status as a firefighter.(ii) The exclusion under this clause shall be included on any sales tax exclusion list made available to retailers.(iii) The department shall issue a firefighter identification card to an individual who has a certification approved by the department.(iv) The department shall develop and implement procedures by which a firefighter can apply for a firefighter identification card.(v) For the purposes of this clause, the following words or phrases shall have the following meanings:"Firefighting equipment" shall mean equipment designed to extinguish, control or stop fire outbreak or protect the user, property or the environment from fire.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0901PN0942 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718